Massachusetts, session 194th, H5429.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Nicholas
Spinale, a firefighter in the town of Chelmsford, shall be eligible for leave from the town without
loss of pay pursuant to section 111F of chapter 41 of the General Laws, retroactive to April 7,
2026, for the period during which he is incapacitated from duty as a Chelmsford firefighter due
to injuries sustained on April 7, 2026 while working for the department of fire services;
provided, that no such leave shall be granted for any period after a physician designated by the
commonwealth or the appointing authority for the town of Chelmsford determines that such
incapacity no longer exists; provided further, Nicholas Spinale shall not be required to waive the
provisions of chapter 152 of the General Laws; provided further, the benefits granted in this
section shall be reduced by the amount of workers’ compensation received by Nicholas Spinale
under said chapter 152. Nicholas Spinale shall be eligible for such injury leave compensation
of 3

during the period of his incapacity until he is cleared to return to duty or until he reaches age 65
or otherwise retires, whichever occurs first. If such incapacity is deemed to be permanent,
Nicholas Spinale shall be eligible to apply for accidental disability retirement pursuant to section
7 of chapter 32 of the General Laws. The commonwealth, the town or Nicholas Spinale may file
the application for disability retirement.
SECTION 2. The commonwealth shall reimburse the town of Chelmsford for its
payment, pursuant to section 1 of this act, of injury leave compensation under section 111F of
chapter 41 of the General Laws and for all other costs including Nicholas Spinale’s medically
necessary hospital, medical, surgical, chiropractic, nursing, pharmaceutical, prosthetic or related
expenses and medically necessary charges for chiropody (podiatry) incurred by the town
pursuant to this act, as the natural and proximate result of the injuries he sustained on April 7,
2026, while working for the department of fire services, retroactive to April 7, 2026.
SECTION 3. In the event the incapacity Nicholas Spinale suffered as a result of the
injuries he sustained on April 7, 2026 is deemed to be permanent, the amount of pension payable
to Nicholas Spinale shall be fixed annually at an amount equal to the rate of regular
compensation which would have been payable to him had he continued in service as a firefighter
at the grade held by him on the date of his disability and the annual amount of accidental
disability retirement annuity he would receive under Option A of the retirement allowances as
provided in section 12 of chapter 32 of the General Laws would apply regardless of which
retirement allowance option he chooses under said section 12. This increased accidental
disability retirement allowance shall end on the date Nicholas Spinale turns 65, at which time his
accidental disability retirement allowance shall revert to an amount equal to what he would be
of 3

eligible to receive under section 7 of said chapter 32. All amounts paid under this act shall be
nontaxable to the extent allowable pursuant to state and federal tax laws.
SECTION 4. If Nicholas Spinale retires as a result of permanent injuries incurred on
April 7, 2026, and he is married at the time of his retirement, if the death of Nicholas Spinale
occurs prior to the date he turns 65 and such spouse survives him, such surviving spouse shall
continue to receive the increased accidental disability retirement until the date he would have
turned 65, at which time such surviving spouse shall be eligible to receive the retirement
allowance provided for a surviving spouse pursuant to the provisions of chapter 32 of the
General Laws.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3